Tennessee, session 114, HB2220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-20-101, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) There is created a state commission to be known as the Tennessee arts
commission, which consists of fifteen (15) members who are broadly representative of
all fields of the performing, visual, and literary arts. The members must be citizens of
this state who have demonstrated a vital interest in the performing, visual, or literary arts.
(b) The Tennessee arts commission as comprised on June 30, 2026, is vacated
on July 1, 2026, and new members are appointed as follows:
(1) The governor shall appoint one (1) person from each of the nine (9)
United States congressional districts in this state. The members' residency is
determined by the congressional district in which such members are registered to
vote;
(2) The speaker of the senate shall appoint one (1) member from each of
the three (3) grand divisions of this state; and
(3) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one (1)
member from each of the three (3) grand divisions of this state.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-20-102, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) To stagger the terms of the newly appointed commission members, initial
appointments must be made as follows:
HB2220
011073
- 1 -

(1) The governor shall appoint:
(A) Members from the first, second, and third United States
congressional districts for initial terms of three (3) years, which expire on
June 30, 2029;
(B) Members from the fourth, fifth, and sixth United States
congressional districts for initial terms of four (4) years, which expire on
June 30, 2030; and
(C) Members from the seventh, eighth, and ninth United States
congressional districts for initial terms of five (5) years, which expire on
June 30, 2031; and
(2) The speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall each appoint:
(A) One (1) member from the eastern grand division for an initial
term of three (3) years, which expires on June 30, 2029;
(B) One (1) member from the middle grand division for an initial
term of four (4) years, which expires on June 30, 2030; and
(C) One (1) member from the western grand division for an initial
term of five (5) years, which expires on June 30, 2031.
(b) All subsequent appointments to the commission are for five (5) years, and
must be made by June 15, begin on July 1, and expire on June 30.
(c) No member of the commission who serves a full five-year term is eligible for
reappointment during a one-year period following the expiration of such member's term.
(d) All vacancies must be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the same
manner as the original appointments.
- 2 - 011073

(e) Upon the expiration of a member's term of office, the member shall continue
to serve until a successor is appointed.
(f)
(1) The members of the commission receive no compensation for their
services but must be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties as members of the commission.
(2) All reimbursement for travel expenses must be in accordance with the
comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance
and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.
(g) The commission shall elect a chair and other officers annually.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011073